District of Columbia statutes.
7-2502.11a

Freedom of information exception.

Any record regarding a person who has applied for, received, or had revoked any registration issued pursuant to this subchapter shall not be made available as a public record under § 2-532.

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title II, § 211a
as added June 16, 2015, D.C. Law 20-279, § 2(d), 62 DCR 1944
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 2(d) of the License to Carry a Pistol Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-74, June 4, 2015, 62 DCR 8242, 21 DCSTAT 1451).